Connecticut, session 2026, SB00164.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate
two million dollars, the proceeds of which shall be used by the
Department of Energy and Environmental Protection for the purpose of
providing a grant-in-aid to the town of Franklin for the implementation
and construction of a sewer and water line in such town with a
connection into the city of Norwich.